windows/es.aff
SFX F Y 551
SFX F   0     lo          [^inz]me
SFX F   0     los         [^inz]me
SFX F   0     la          [^inz]me
SFX F   0     las         [^inz]me
SFX F   0     le          [^inz]me
SFX F   0     les         [^inz]me
SFX F   me    telo        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    telos       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    tela        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    telas       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    tele        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    teles       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    selo        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    selos       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    sela        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    selas       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    sele        [^inz]me
SFX F   me    seles       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    noslo       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    noslos      [^inz]me
SFX F   me    nosla       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    nosla       [^inz]me
SFX F   me    nosles      [^inz]me
SFX F   me    nosles      [^inz]me
SFX F   azme  ázmelo      azme
SFX F   azme  ázmelos     azme
SFX F   azme  ázmela      azme
SFX F   azme  ázmelas     azme
SFX F   azme  ázmele      azme
SFX F   azme  ázmeles     azme
SFX F   azme  áztelo      azme
SFX F   azme  áztelos     azme
SFX F   azme  áztela      azme
SFX F   azme  áztelas     azme
SFX F   azme  áztele      azme
SFX F   azme  ázteles     azme
SFX F   azme  ázselo      azme
SFX F   azme  ázselos     azme
SFX F   azme  ázsela      azme
SFX F   azme  ázselas     azme
SFX F   azme  ázsele      azme
SFX F   azme  ázseles     azme
SFX F   azme  áznoslo     azme
SFX F   azme  áznoslos    azme
SFX F   azme  áznosla     azme
SFX F   azme  áznoslas    azme
SFX F   azme  áznosle     azme
SFX F   azme  áznosles    azme
SFX F   enme  énmelo      enme
SFX F   enme  énmelos     enme
SFX F   enme  énmela      enme
SFX F   enme  énmelas     enme
SFX F   enme  énmele      enme
SFX F   enme  énmeles     enme
SFX F   enme  éntelo      enme
SFX F   enme  éntelos     enme
SFX F   enme  éntela      enme
SFX F   enme  éntelas     enme
SFX F   enme  éntele      enme
SFX F   enme  énteles     enme
SFX F   enme  énselo      enme
SFX F   enme  énselos     enme
SFX F   enme  énsela      enme
SFX F   enme  énselas     enme
SFX F   enme  énsele      enme
SFX F   enme  énseles     enme
SFX F   enme  énnoslo     enme
SFX F   enme  énnoslos    enme
SFX F   enme  énnosla     enme
SFX F   enme  énnosla     enme
SFX F   enme  énnosles    enme
SFX F   enme  énnosles    enme
SFX F   ime   ímelo       ime
SFX F   ime   ímelos      ime
SFX F   ime   ímela       ime
SFX F   ime   ímelas      ime
SFX F   ime   ímele       ime
SFX F   ime   ímeles      ime
SFX F   ime   ítelo       ime
SFX F   ime   ítelos      ime
SFX F   ime   ítela       ime
SFX F   ime   ítelas      ime
SFX F   ime   ítele       ime
SFX F   ime   íteles      ime
SFX F   ime   íselo       ime
SFX F   ime   íselos      ime
SFX F   ime   ísela       ime
SFX F   ime   íselas      ime
SFX F   ime   ísele       ime
SFX F   ime   íseles      ime
SFX F   ime   ínoslo      ime
SFX F   ime   ínoslos     ime
SFX F   ime   ínosla      ime
SFX F   ime   ínosla      ime
SFX F   ime   ínosles     ime
SFX F   ime   ínosles     ime
SFX F   onme  ónmelo      onme
SFX F   onme  ónmelos     onme
SFX F   onme  ónmela      onme
SFX F   onme  ónmelas     onme
SFX F   onme  ónmele      onme
SFX F   onme  ónmeles     onme
SFX F   onme  óntelo      onme
SFX F   onme  óntelos     onme
SFX F   onme  óntela      onme
SFX F   onme  óntelas     onme
SFX F   onme  óntele      onme
SFX F   onme  ónteles     onme
SFX F   onme  ónselo      onme
SFX F   onme  ónselos     onme
SFX F   onme  ónsela      onme
SFX F   onme  ónselas     onme
SFX F   onme  ónsele      onme
SFX F   onme  ónseles     onme
SFX F   onme  ónnoslo     onme
SFX F   onme  ónnoslos    onme
SFX F   onme  ónnosla     onme
SFX F   onme  ónnoslas    onme
SFX F   onme  ónnosle     onme
SFX F   onme  ónnosles    onme
SFX F   ceme  zcamelo     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcamelos    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcamela     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcamelas    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcamele     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcameles    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcaselo     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcaselos    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcasela     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcaselas    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcasele     [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcaseles    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanoslo    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanoslos   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanosla    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanoslas   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanosle    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanosles   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmelo    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmelos   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmela    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmelas   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmele    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanmeles   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanselo    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanselos   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcansela    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanselas   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcansele    [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcanseles   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannoslo   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannoslos  [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannosla   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannoslas  [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannosle   [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  zcannosles  [^f][áéóú]ceme
SFX F   ceme  gamelo      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gamelos     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gamela      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gamelas     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gamele      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gameles     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gaselo      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gaselos     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gasela      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gaselas     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gasele      fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gaseles     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganoslo     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganoslos    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganosla     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganoslas    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganosle     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganosles    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmelo     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmelos    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmela     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmelas    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmele     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganmeles    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganselo     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganselos    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gansela     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganselas    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gansele     fáceme
SFX F   ceme  ganseles    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gannoslo    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gannoslos   fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gannosla    fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gannoslas   fáceme
SFX F   ceme  gannosle    fáceme
SFX F   enme  éngamelo    enme
SFX F   enme  éngamelos   enme
SFX F   enme  éngamela    enme
SFX F   enme  éngamelas   enme
SFX F   enme  éngamele    enme
SFX F   enme  éngameles   enme
SFX F   enme  éngaselo    enme
SFX F   enme  éngaselos   enme
SFX F   enme  éngasela    enme
SFX F   enme  éngaselas   enme
SFX F   enme  éngasele    enme
SFX F   enme  éngaseles   enme
SFX F   enme  énganoslo   enme
SFX F   enme  énganoslos  enme
SFX F   enme  énganosla   enme
SFX F   enme  énganoslas  enme
SFX F   enme  énganosle   enme
SFX F   enme  énganosles  enme
SFX F   enme  énganmelo   enme
SFX F   enme  énganmelos  enme
SFX F   enme  énganmela   enme
SFX F   enme  énganmelas  enme
SFX F   enme  énganmele   enme
SFX F   enme  énganmeles  enme
SFX F   enme  énganselo   enme
SFX F   enme  énganselos  enme
SFX F   enme  éngansela   enme
SFX F   enme  énganselas  enme
SFX F   enme  éngansele   enme
SFX F   enme  énganseles  enme
SFX F   enme  éngannoslo  enme
SFX F   enme  éngannoslos enme
SFX F   enme  éngannosla  enme
SFX F   enme  éngannoslas enme
SFX F   enme  éngannosle  enme
SFX F   enme  éngannosles enme
SFX F   ime   ígamelo     ime
SFX F   ime   ígamelos    ime
SFX F   ime   ígamela     ime
SFX F   ime   ígamelas    ime
SFX F   ime   ígamele     ime
SFX F   ime   ígameles    ime
SFX F   ime   ígaselo     ime
SFX F   ime   ígaselos    ime
SFX F   ime   ígasela     ime
SFX F   ime   ígaselas    ime
SFX F   ime   ígasele     ime
SFX F   ime   ígaseles    ime
SFX F   ime   íganoslo    ime
SFX F   ime   íganoslos   ime
