windows/es.dic
átame/ACEF
ínflame/ACEF
úntame/ACEF
añádeme/ACEF
abréviame/ACEF
acércame/ACEF
acaríciame/ACEF
aclárame/ACEF
actívame/ACEF
actualízame/ACEF
adécuame/ACEF
adóptame/ACEF
adhiéreme/ACEF
adjudícame/ACEF
adviérteme/ACEF
agénciame/ACEF
agrúpame/ACEF
agradéceme/CF
aléjame/ACEF
alcánzame/ACEF
alquílame/ACEF
amplíame/ACEF
anúdame/ACEF
analízame/ACEF
anticípame/ACEF
apágame/ACEF
apóyame/ACEF
aplícame/ACEF
apréciame/ACEF
aprópiame/ACEF
arréglame/ACEF
asígname/ACEF
asegúrame/ACEF
bájame/ACEF
bórrame/ACEF
bloquéame/ACEF
cálzame/ACEF
cántame/ACEF
cédeme/ACEF
cóbrame/ACEF
cómeme/ACEF
cópiame/ACEF
cúbreme/ACEF
calíficame/ACEF
caliéntame/ACEF
captúrame/ACEF
ciégame/ACEF
ciñeme/ACEF
clasifícame/ACEF
cofinánciame/ACEF
coméntame/ACEF
compáctame/ACEF
compénsame/ACEF
complétame/ACEF
compleméntame/ACEF
comunícame/ACEF
concédeme/ACEF
confírmame/ACEF
configúrame/ACEF
consígueme/ACEF
consiénteme/ACEF
contabilízame/ACEF
contusióname/ACEF
conviérteme/ACEF
créame/ACEF
cuéntame/ACEF
cuantifícame/ACEF
déjame/ACEF
dóname/ACEF
declárame/ACEF
dedícame/ACEF
deletréame/ACEF
deséchame/ACEF
desactívame/ACEF
desapártame/ACEF
desbloquéame/ACEF
descodifícame/ACEF
descomponme/ACF
descuéntame/ACEF
desencólame/ACEF
deshazme/ACF
desinféctame/ACEF
desplázame/ACEF
desvíame/ACEF
diferénciame/ACEF
dime/ACFS
dirígeme/ACEF
documéntame/ACEF
duplícame/ACEF
ejecútame/ACEF
elígeme/ACEF
emúlame/ACEF
encárgame/ACEF
encólame/ACEF
enciérrame/ACEF
enfócame/ACEF
englóbame/ACEF
ensámblame/ACEF
entiérrame/ACEF
entrecógeme/ACEF
enumérame/ACEF
escríbeme/ACEF
espúlgame/ACEF
espúrriame/ACEF
espurréame/ACEF
esquíciame/ACEF
esquílame/ACEF
esquíname/ACEF
esquívame/ACEF
esquematízame/ACEF
estámbrame/ACEF
estáncame/ACEF
estíbame/ACEF
estírame/ACEF
estóvame/ACEF
estúdiame/ACEF
estúprame/ACEF
estúrgame/ACEF
estabilízame/ACEF
establéceme/CF
estacióname/ACEF
estantálame/ACEF
estercólame/ACEF
estilízame/ACEF
estipéndiame/ACEF
estiptícame/ACEF
estomágame/ACEF
estornúdame/ACEF
estréchame/ACEF
estréname/ACEF
estríbame/ACEF
estrangúlame/ACEF
estriégame/ACEF
estructúrame/ACEF
etiquétame/ACEF
evádeme/ACEF
evócame/ACEF
evangelízame/ACEF
evaporízame/ACEF
evolucióname/ACEF
exéntame/ACEF
exímeme/ACEF
exacérbame/ACEF
examíname/ACEF
excédeme/ACEF
excóriame/ACEF
excúsame/ACEF
exceptúame/ACEF
exhíbeme/ACEF
exonérame/ACEF
expátriame/ACEF
expóliame/ACEF
expúrgame/ACEF
expectórame/ACEF
explícame/ACEF
exprésame/ACEF
extíngueme/ACEF
extasíame/ACEF
extiéndeme/ACEF
extrémame/ACEF
extravíame/ACEF
fállame/ACEF
fíame/ACEF
fíjame/ACEF
fíliame/ACEF
fírmame/ACEF
fóllame/ACEF
fórmame/ACEF
fúmame/ACEF
fúndeme/ACEF
fabrícame/ACEF
facilítame/ACEF
faldéame/ACEF
fastídiame/ACEF
fecúndame/ACEF
fedérame/ACEF
ferméntame/ACEF
festéjame/ACEF
filosófame/ACEF
finalízame/ACEF
fisgonéame/ACEF
flagélame/ACEF
formúlame/ACEF
fotocópiame/ACEF
fréname/ACEF
frótame/ACEF
fragméntame/ACEF
friccióname/ACEF
fumígame/ACEF
gáname/ACEF
gangréname/ACEF
genérame/ACEF
glóriame/ACEF
grábame/ACEF
hazme/ACF
impídeme/ACEF
increméntame/ACEF
inmovilízame/ACEF
insinúame/ACEF
intercámbiame/ACEF
interprétame/ACEF
invéntame/ACEF
júrame/ACEF
lánzame/ACEF
libérame/ACEF
llámame/ACEF
mándame/ACEF
méteme/ACEF
mídeme/ACEF
machácame/ACEF
matízame/ACEF
menéame/ACEF
modifícame/ACEF
muestréame/ACEF
necesítame/ACEF
ocúltame/ACEF
ofréceme/CF
organízame/ACEF
pálpame/ACEF
pásame/ACEF
píntame/ACEF
permíteme/ACEF
plántame/ACEF
ponme/ACF
posponme/ACF
predíceme/CF
preséntame/ACEF
prevenme/ACF
prodúceme/CF
proponme/ACF
prosígueme/ACEF
pruébame/ACEF
quémame/ACEF
ráscame/ACEF
rómpeme/ACEF
reactívame/ACEF
realízame/ACEF
rebautízame/ACEF
recíbeme/ACEF
recógeme/ACEF
recodifícame/ACEF
redáctame/ACEF
rediséñame/ACEF
reescríbeme/ACEF
refréscame/ACEF
regálame/ACEF
rehazme/ACF
reintégrame/ACEF
reléeme/ACEF
remodélame/ACEF
repíteme/ACEF
represéntame/ACEF
resúmeme/ACEF
retómame/ACEF
retrátame/ACEF
sácame/ACEF
súbeme/ACEF
satisfáceme/CF
sepárame/ACEF
sobreescríbeme/ACEF
solicítame/ACEF
sopórtame/ACEF
suéltame/ACEF
suplícame/ACEF
suspéndeme/ACEF
tenme/ACF
trágame/ACEF
transfórmame/ACEF
traspásame/ACEF
véndeme/ACEF
ventílame/ACEF
